Mississippi, session 2026, HB1445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following section shall be codified as Section 45-41-5, Mississippi Code of 1972: 45-41-5.  (1)  This section shall be known and cited as the "Mississippi Gold Alert System Act of 2026." (2)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  A significantly large number of missing persons eighteen (18) to twenty-three (23) years of age are often found dead or severely injured; (b)  Many persons in this age range are legally adults, but are still under the financial custody of their parents who are not notified in a timely manner when they are missing; and (c)  When persons eighteen (18) to twenty-six (23) years of age are missing many families are left with the unfortunate result that some individuals never return to their homes or to their families; and (d)  No statewide, organized system exists to quickly respond to missing persons in this age group. (3)  When used in this section, unless the context requires a different definition, the following terms shall have the following meanings: (a)  "E911" means Enhanced Universal Emergency Number Service or Enhanced 911 Service, which is a telephone exchange communications service by which a Public Safety Answering Point designated by the county or local communication district may receive telephone calls dialed to the telephone number 911. (b)  "First responders" means state and local law enforcement personnel, fire department personnel, emergency medical personnel, emergency management personnel and public works personnel who may be deployed to bioterrorism attacks, terrorist attacks, catastrophic or natural disasters and emergencies. (c)  "Originating local law enforcement agency" means a local police or sheriff's office that has jurisdiction over the area where a person became missing. (4)  (a)  The Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety shall implement a statewide "Gold Alert System" that has the purpose of providing a tiered, rapid response system to notify the public about missing endangered adults, who are eighteen (18) to twenty-six (26) years of age.  The initial response may be local, statewide or national based on available information about the missing person. (b)  A Gold Alert activation request may be made only by a law enforcement agency, and the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety may only activate a Gold Alert after a request is made. (c)  To activate a Gold Alert, all of the following criteria must be met: (i)  The adult age eighteen (18) to twenty-three (23) years of age is believed to be missing and in imminent danger regardless of circumstance; (ii)  The family, guardian or person who discovered that the individual was missing has submitted a missing person's report to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the person became missing, with all waiting periods being waived; and (iii)  The law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction of where the person became missing reports the incident to the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety through the Mississippi Highway Patrol Headquarters Communication Center. (d)  To initiate a request to activate a Gold Alert, the family, guardian or person who discovered that the individual was missing must file immediately a report of the missing person with the local law enforcement agency where the person became missing that includes the following information: (i)  A description of the missing person including physical characteristics, clothing and photos, if available; (ii)  A description of the known circumstances under which the person became missing including the time, place, direction, possible destinations, whether the person is walking or in a vehicle, and all other pertinent information concerning where the person may have become missing; and (iii)  Updates on the missing person as new information becomes available. (e)  The originating local law enforcement agency, after completing the investigation expeditiously and determining that the case meets the qualifying criteria prescribed in this section, shall: (i)  Waive in the case of a Gold Alert, any waiting periods for a missing person's report in order to galvanize the appropriate communities rapidly to assist in the search for and the safe recovery of the missing person; (ii)  Notify the Mississippi Highway Patrol Headquarters Communication Center and electronically send to the center the completed Gold Alert forms and available photos, signed by the police chief, sheriff, commanding officer or his or her designee; (iii)  Enter the information into the National Crime Information Center (NCIC); (iv)  Using a tiered approach based on known circumstances, initiate an alert bulletin to all local law enforcement, E911 and first responder agencies to search the immediate area; (v)  Activate secondary alert systems to residents, businesses, and broadcast media in the immediate area; (vi)  Provide a twenty-four-hour phone number to receive calls while continuing the investigation; and (vii)  Update the family, guardian or person who discovered that the individual was missing, as new information becomes available. (5)  (a)  After the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety has been contacted by a local law enforcement agency requesting a Gold Alert activation, the Criminal Information Center shall consider before the activation of the Gold Alert procedures by the Gold Alert coordinator, or his or her designee, the information contained in the initial Gold Alert report form to ensure that it meets all criteria specified in subsection (4)(c) of this section.  Elements of the missing person case to be considered are: (i)  Threat of imminent harm or death to the missing person because of age, health, mental or physical disability, environmental or weather conditions; (ii)  Time of initial report in relation to the time of disappearance, including whether the disappearance is unexplained, involuntary or is under suspicious circumstances; (iii)  Believed to be walking or in a vehicle; (iv)  Witness information; (v)  Possible domestic dispute involving the missing person; and (vi)  Other facts that indicate the missing person is in danger of serious injury or death, including whether there is possible criminal intent toward the missing person or whether someone witnessed the disappearance. (b)  Each case shall be reviewed on its own merits, and if there are extenuating circumstances, the required criteria in this section may be amended or expanded depending on the merits presented. (c)  Only the Gold Alert coordinator, or his or her designee, may authorize activation of a statewide Gold Alert and if an activation is authorized, the Criminal Information Center shall: (i)  Prepare an announcement concerning the missing person; (ii)  Contact the designated media stations to activate the alert; and (iii)  Request the Mississippi Department of Transportation to activate electronic signs, if appropriate. (d)  If the missing person is believed to be in a vehicle, the Gold Alert coordinator shall send information and available photos via emails and fax to the statewide communications systems, news media and other forms of public communication or electronic resources. (6)  (a)  Following the initial alert, a Gold Alert  broadcast shall be updated by television and radio stations as necessary until such time that an end of alert message is received from the law enforcement agency that requested the initial Gold Alert. (b)  Local and statewide broadcast stations shall exercise their own independent discretions as to whether to repeat the required broadcasts prescribed in this section more frequently and shall determine the frequency in which the alert is re-broadcast following the initial alert. (c)  The Gold Alert termination notification shall be issued twenty-four (24) hours after the airing of the latest and most current information or when the case has been resolved and verification from the originating local law enforcement agency has been received by the Department of Public Safety. (7)  (a)  If the circumstances of a person's disappearance do not meet the criteria for a Gold Alert to activate statewide communication systems, in addition to a local law enforcement agency activating a Purple Alert, the Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety may offer an alternate form of mass notification as provided in this section. (b)  The alternate form of mass notification may be an email that includes a photograph and the Gold Alert initial reporting form that is sent through a statewide network of law enforcement and first responder agencies, news media offices and other forms of public communication. (c)  The email authorized in paragraph (b) of this subsection (7) shall contain information taken from the Gold Alert initial reporting form that is submitted by the originating local law enforcement agency. (d)  The email alerting news media and law enforcement agencies of a person's disappearance that does not meet the criteria of a Gold Alert activation shall include the following paragraph at the beginning of the email: "The (name of law enforcement agency) has requested the following information be provided to the Mississippi news media and law enforcement agencies:  At the present time, information being provided to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety by the (name of law enforcement agency) does not meet the criteria to activate a Gold Alert.  It is left to the discretion of each law enforcement agency and news department receiving this email as to whether the attached information, regarding the disappearance of this person and/or the photograph of this person, will be released to the public." (e)  If further investigation into the disappearance produces evidence that may change the initial circumstances as reported to local law enforcement, the Department of Public Safety may reconsider activating a Gold Alert notwithstanding the existence of an active Purple Alert previously initiated by a local law enforcement agency. SECTION 2.  Section 45-41-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-41-3.  (1)  In addition to the statewide Silver Alert System * * *required under Section 45-41-1 * * *and, the Gold Alert System under Section 45-41-5 and the Amber Alert System operated by the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety, there is established the Purple Alert as a standardized system to be used by local law enforcement agencies to aid in the search of a missing person.  A Purple Alert may be in addition to:  an active Amber Alert; an active Silver Alert; an active Gold Alert or any mass notification provided by email regarding a person's disappearance that does not meet the criteria for a Silver Alert * * *, as authorized under Section 45‑41‑1(7) or Gold Alert. (2)  At a minimum, a Purple Alert must: (a)  Be determined by a local law enforcement agency, in an emergency situation, to be a viable means by which a missing person is likely to be returned to safety; (b)  Provide, to the greatest extent possible, for the protection of the privacy, dignity and independence of the missing person by including standards aimed at preventing the inadvertent or unnecessary broadcasting or dissemination of sensitive health and diagnostic information; (c)  Limit the broadcasting and dissemination of alerts and related information to the geographic areas where the missing person could reasonably be, considering the person's circumstances and physical and mental condition, the potential modes of transportation available to the person or suspected to be involved, and the known or suspected circumstances of the person's disappearance; and (d)  Be activated only when a law enforcement agency receives a report of a missing person which includes the information required under Section 45-41-1(4)(d). (3)  Under a Purple Alert, a local law enforcement agency may broadcast information concerning a missing person: (a)  Who has: a mental or cognitive disability that is not Alzheimer's disease or a dementia-related disorder; an intellectual disability or a developmental disability; a brain injury; another physical, mental or emotional disability that is not related to substance abuse; or a combination of any of these; (b)  Whose disappearance indicates a credible threat of immediate danger or serious bodily harm to himself or herself, as determined by the local law enforcement agency; and (c)  Who most likely cannot be returned to safety without law enforcement intervention. (4)  If a Purple Alert is determined to be necessary and appropriate, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction must notify the media and persons who have subscribed to receive alert notifications in the jurisdiction or jurisdictions where the missing person may be located.  The law enforcement agency also must report the person missing to the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation of the Department of Public Safety. (5)  The Purple Alert system must include procedures to monitor the use, activation and results of alerts and a strategy for informing and educating law enforcement, the media and other stakeholders concerning the alert. (6)  A local law enforcement agency may activate a Purple Alert notwithstanding the existence of an active Silver Alert, Gold Alert or Amber Alert for the same missing person if the agency determines that a Purple Alert may improve the chances of finding the person. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.